Tennessee, session 114, SB1877.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 65-3-124, is amended by deleting the
language "2022--2026" and substituting the language "2022--2027".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 65-3-124, is further amended by
deleting the language "July 1, 2027" and substituting instead the language "July 1, 2028".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1877
010049
- 1 -